Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.320

City sealers—Director—General oversight powers, concurrent authority—Powers and duties of chapter are additional.

(1) In cities for which city sealers have been appointed as provided for in this chapter, the director shall have general oversight powers over city weights and measures programs and may, when he or she deems it reasonably necessary, exercise concurrent authority to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(2) When the director elects to exercise concurrent authority within a city with a duly appointed city sealer, the director's powers and duties relative to this chapter shall be in addition to the powers granted in any such city by law or charter.

[ 1995 c 355 s 14; 1992 c 237 s 22; 1969 c 67 s 32.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective dates—1995 c 355: See notes following RCW 19.94.015.